Washington statutes.
RCW 7.68.101

Duties of attending physician or licensed advanced registered nurse practitioner—Medical information.

Physicians or licensed *advanced registered nurse practitioners examining or attending injured victims under this chapter shall comply with rules and regulations adopted by the director, and shall make such reports as may be requested by the department upon the condition or treatment of any such victim, or upon any other matters concerning such victims in their care. Except under RCW 49.17.210 and 49.17.250, all medical information in the possession or control of any person and relevant to the particular injury in the opinion of the department pertaining to any victim whose injury is the basis of a claim under this chapter shall be made available at any stage of the proceedings to the claimant's representative and the department upon request, and no person shall incur any legal liability by reason of releasing such information.

[ 2011 c 346 s 307.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The term "advanced registered nurse practitioner" was changed to "advanced practice registered nurse" by 2024 c 239 s 1, effective June 30, 2027.

Intent—Retroactive application—Effective date—2011 c 346: See notes following RCW 7.68.020.